Biker reacts at lightning speed and prevents worse
On Friday evening, a traffic accident occurred on the road between Machtolsheim and Merklingen, in which a motorcyclist was only slightly injured thanks to his quick reaction.
Motorist overlooks bikers
At around 9: 30 p.m., a 44-year-old driver wanted to turn left at around 9: 30 p.m. with her VW from Merklingen onto Landesstraße 1230 in the direction of Machtolsheim.
In doing so, she overlooked the 24-year-old motorcyclist coming from Nellingen.
During the collision, hand and foot brake levers fly away during the collision
The biker tried to avoid the car, but stroamed it at the rear of the vehicle.
Due to the stripping process, the hand and foot brake levers were demolished on the Suzuki and the driver was no longer able to brake down.
At the mind, he steered his motorcycle in the green stiffs next to the road and let it roll out there without falling down.
Bikiker suffers leg injury
Due to the collision with the car, the biker was injured and had to be treated in a clinic.
Mamming: Corona mass infection: 174 harvesters infected
After a corona mass infection on a large vegetable farm in Mamming in Lower Bavaria, almost 500 people are under quarantine and are no longer allowed to leave the farm.
A security service supervises the ban on nightout.
A total of 174 harvesters were tested positive for the corona pathogen Sars-CoV-2 during the screening, as the district office Dingolfing-Landau on Saturday evening.
"In order to avoid further expansion, we unfortunately have to take this step to protect the population," explained District Administrator Werner Bumeder (CSU).
Previously, seven employees had already become infected in the company - this was the occasion for the series test.
The farm is a large vegetable farm that grows strawberries, cucumbers, cabbage and beetroot - but the cucumbers only for inlay glasses.
Mamming is a rural community with a good 3300 inhabitants not far from Dingolfing with its large BMW plant.
Bumeder appealed to the citizens to keep calm: "According to our information, it is a closed group of people".
On the farm, infected by uninfected employees were separated, the site is now surrounded by a barrier fence.
Greens and SPD gave the state government co-responsibility.
The two opposition factions accused Prime Minister Markus Söder (CSU) and his cabinet of neglecting the control of the housing of seasonal workers.
"This can take revenge bitterly if such local infection events have to take out and regional lockdowns have to be ordered," said Jürgen Mistol, the parliamentary managing director of the Greens.
The SPD looks quite similar to this: "After the Corona outbreak in the Wiesenhof slaughterhouse in mid-May, we have already called for a special control programme for farms with harvesters," said environmental expert Florian von Brunn.
"In our view, the hygiene conditions at the workplace and the living conditions must be sharply monitored.
This obviously did not happen. "
The outbreak came "with announcement".
Aidenbachstraße underground station: Dangerous dispute: 19-year-olds falls into the track bed after Schubser
In a dispute between two youth groups at the subway station Aidenbachstraße, a 19-year-old fell through a Schubser and slipped into the track bed.
Obersendling - On Friday there was a dispute between two youth groups at the subway station Aidenbachstraße at 16.15 o'clock.
A passer-by alerted the police, who approached with several strips.
According to the first investigation, a Munich man (17) pushed a 19-year-old to the ground.
The young man slid over the platform edge and fell into the track bed.
People from the 17-year-old group helped the fallen man to climb out of the track.
There was no danger from an arriving railway.
According to the police, there were again clashes between the two people.
The 17-year-old initially fled the scene, but his personal details could be determined in retrospect.
Accompanied by his father, he went to Police Inspectorate 29.
The 17-year-old is investigated for bodily harm.
Report: Seehofer urges for longer data retention
Data retention is currently suspended.
According to a media report, however, Federal Minister of the Interior Horst Seehofer calls for an extension of the storage period.
He wants to strengthen the fight against child abuse.
According to a media report, Federal Minister of the Interior Horst Seehofer (CSU) calls for extended data retention - half a year instead of the planned ten weeks.
As the "Bild am Sonntag" reports, Seehofer Minister of Justice Christine Lambrecht (SPD) asked for a quick change of the law in a letter.
Seehofer wants to strengthen the measures against child abuse.
He considers it makes sense to "make urgently needed adjustments to the law now," the paper quotes from the letter.
Data retention is currently suspended.
A decision of the ECJ is expected to do so.
Seehofer, however, wants the amendments beforehand so that they could be applied immediately after a possible positive judgment, the report continues.
A spokesman for the Ministry of Justice told the newspaper that it was only be examined sensisible whether legal adjustments are required if the courts had ruled.
In the fight against child abuse and child pornography, Seehofer, together with the interior ministers of the Länder, had already spoken out in favour of data retention in June.
NBA: Strip club trouble for clipper star Lou Williams
Excitement in the NBA!
Lou Williams (33), professional basketball player for the Los Angeles Clippers, is said to have left the tournament quarter in Disney World in Orlando, Florida with permission for a funeral.
According to US media reports, he visited the strip club "Magic City" in Atlanta in the evening.
According to ESPN, Williams, who is said to have admitted the visit according to ESPN information, is back in isloation and is tested daily on COVID-19.
His reason for the visit: Chicken Wings.
In February last year, "Sweet Lou", as he is called in the NBA, has already expressed his love for exactly these wings.
The American wrote: "Magic City and Blue Flame (another strip club in Atlanta) have the best wings in town".
NBA insider Shams Charania announced on Twitter on Sunday that the NBA has ordered Williams a ten-day quarantine.
The clipper star misses the first two official games after the test game phase.
In Disney World, the NBA wants to play the Corona season.
Currently, the top 22 teams with training games are preparing for the season final starting on Friday during the night.
Söder expresses himself on the corona position after mass infecton
Munich - Health Minister Melanie Huml (CSU) has already announced a test offensive for large farms on Sunday.
The press conference will be shown live on our homepage.
The case in Mamming in the district of Dingolfing-Landau has startled authorities and politicians.
Almost 500 harvesters from several countries are currently working on the large vegetable farm, more than a third have become infected with the corona pathogen.
The farm is now under quarantine and is locked off with a building fence.
Nobody is allowed to leave the site, food is delivered.
The authorities are now offering free corona tests to the approximately 3,300 inhabitants of the municipality.
Since the harvesters had little contact with the local population, the district office previously assumes that the infections have not spread beyond the farm.
"Kemorse": confession of the alleged arson of Nantes
"My client was cooperative," said lawyer Quentin Chabert to the newspaper.
The defense ender added, "He very much regrets the deeds, the confession was a liberation for him."
His mandate was "plagued by remorse and taken away by the extent of the destruction".
In the event of a conviction, according to the prosecutor's office, the man is threatened with ten years imprisonment and a fine of 150,000 euros.
The Gothic Cathedral of St. Peter and Paul Cathedral in Nantes was severely damaged in a fire on the night of Saturday last week.
The fire broke out in three distant places in the church.
Laboratory tests confirmed the suspicion of arson.
The now imprisoned suspect had already been arrested a few hours after the fire.
He was released after a day.
The man works as a volunteer for the diocese of Nantes and was responsible for the closure of the cathedral on the eve of the fire.
Since there was no trace of a violent intrusion into the church, he quickly came into the focus of the investigators.
Discuss the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule
Former DFB President Reinhard Grindel has recommended thinking about the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule.
"German football should at least discuss, set conditions and clear rules for investors before the EU Commission creates perfect facts," said Grindel of the "Bild am Sonntag".
He stressed: "For the clubs that can most likely to become dangerous to Bavaria and Dortmund, the 50 + 1 rules do not work anyway: see Leipzig or Leverkusen.
In this respect, one cannot get around the debate whether it is not necessary to facilitate the involvement of clubs that want to break into this phalanx to involve investors ".
However, he has doubts as to whether there is a willingness in the German Football League there is a willingness to allow majority stakes in the German Football League, which are prohibited in the Bundesliga by the 50 + 1 rule.
"It remains a legal risk to draw investment fences around Bundesliga as a business location in a European internal market," said Grindel.
The former DFB boss sees the danger that "the attempts to ensure more competitive balance in the Bundesliga will ultimately only weaken the competitiveness of our top clubs at European level, but do not lead to more excitement in the championship".
Even a equal distribution of TV money will not achieve a decisive effect.
"FC Bayern makes a turnover of 750 million euros, Borussia Dortmund of 500 million and RB Leipzig of 300 million.
So the differences are already immense among the first three clubs alone.
The other 15 clubs have an average budget of 130 million, "said the 58-year-old.
With a view to the past, Grindel feels betrayed.
"Unfortunately, there have been people who noticed this mistake and pierced the press instead of addressing to it," Grindel said about the adoption of an expensive watch that led to his resignation in April 2019.
"That has already occupied me a lot humanly."
He received the gift worth around 11,000 euros from a Ukrainian functionary.
"I committed a compliance violation, and it was right to draw the consequences from it," Grindel said.
"I treated the ominous watch gift in a completely transparently and unsuspecting.
Many at the DFB knew about it. "
He never "made a secret of the gift," assured the 58-year-old.
"This may be called naive, at least this form of transparency was the complete opposite of corruption".
"Black Lives Matter": Injured and a Dead
The protests against police violence in the United States have escalated again by Donald Trump ’ s deployment of federal police in several cities.
On Saturday, there were clashes between demonstrators and police officers in various cities.
Three people were injured in Louisville and 16 people were arrested in Seattle.
In Austin, one person was killed by shots, while a demonstration march was crossing a junction.
Previously, there had been clashes in Portland during protests against racism and police violence.
The security forces, including federal police officers, used tear gas on the night of Saturday and violently attacked demonstrators.
Hundreds of partly armed demonstrators marched through Louisville, Kentucky on Saturday, demanding that those responsible for the death of Breonna Taylor be held accountable.
The 26-year-old student was shot in March in a drug raid at her home in Louisville in March.
The aim of the raid was someone else who did not live there, and no drugs were found.
When a member of a group calling itself an armed alliance of black Americans shot a shot on Saturday, three people were injured.
According to NBC, they were taken to the hospital.
None of them were in mortal danger.
The police set up barricades because counter-demonstrators of a white militia had also formed.
In timend, the two groups did not meet.
In Austin, Texas, one person was shot and died during a "Black Lives Matter" demonstration and died.
The police took a suspect into custody.
She has not yet provided further information on the circumstances of the crime.
According to the New York Times, Mayor Steve Adler said that he was, like many in the city, "inconsolable and stunned" because of what had happened.
In the American metropolis of Seattle, too, demonstrators clashed with the police in the American metropolis of Seattle on Saturday.
They set fire to construction cars in front of a youth prison, and the police used glare grenades and pepper spray.
According to the Seattle Times, 16 people were arrested for resistance to police or bodily harm.
In the city of Oakland, California, a courthouse was set on fire in the city of Oakland, California.
A small group of protesters had broken windows, shot down fireworks, and blinded police officers with lasers, the Oakland police late Saturday evening (local time).
The fire was quickly extinguished.
In Aurora, a suburb of Denver, Colorado, a car drove through a crowd demonstrating on a highway.
According to the police, one of the protesters fired a gun and at least one person was taken to the hospital injured.
In addition, windows were also broken in a court and a fire was set, as the police reported.
Investigations was opened.
Rakoczy in Bad Kissingen: Historical costumes defy Corona
Although the big break in the spa town was lacking, visitors and performers enjoyed the rakoczy flair of the alternative program.
It was unusual for visitors, performers and organizers: the Rakoczy weekend without Rakoczy festival.
But: even if the big party mile in the city center was missing, the crowds and program highlights such as Saale, Rakoczy ball or paression, many got their money's worth in the Corona-compliant alternative program.
"I think we have succeeded in spreading rakoczy flair," says Prime Director Sylvie Thormann.
The guests would have accepted it well.
In principle, one return to the beginnings of the Rakoczy festival, when the historical ones were the focus of the festival.
Pleasant atmosphere
Vesna Konhäuser has been visiting Bad Kissingen with her husband for more than 25 years for the Rakoczy festival Bad Kissingen for more than 25 years.
So also this time in the Corona year.
The couple have made themselves comfortable at Luitpold Casino, watching the historical while strolling and listening to the Cuban live music at the casino restaurant.
"I find it quite pleasant," says Konhäuser.
She does not miss the crowds who otherwise belong to Rakoczy.
However, you lacks the usual program highlights, especially Saale burns on Friday evening as well as the historic procade and the final fireworks on Sunday evening.
"That's a pity.
The weather would have been great this year, "she says.
Rakoczy equestrian tournament will take place Again
For the performers of the historical spa guests, the alternative program sometimes meant more work.
For example, for Christina Gold, who participates in the procession in a normal year and can be seen there on the carriage of the Kurgartencafés.
This year she was on foot in the city on Saturdays and Sundays in costume on foot in the city on Saturdays and Sundays.
"This's more strenuous, otherwise we'll have it easier," she says.
The equestrian club had less to do, even if individual riders were on the road in the park.
"We very much hope that the equestrian quadrille will take place again next year," says Chairman Ulrike Waldhofen.
She announced that after a break of several years in 2021, a Rakoczy equestrian tournament would take place again in 2021.
28 Corona cases with Spanish second division club Fuenlabrada
The Spanish second division football club CF Fuenlabrada is sliding deeper and deeper into the crisis due to a Corona outbreak.
Since the newcomer from near Madrid had flown to the city of A Coruña for a game in the city of A Coruña on 20 July despite the first Corona Falls on 20 July, one low strike follows the next.
By Sunday, 28 players or team members had been tested positive, one of them came to the hospital, the club announced.
Fuenlabrada from the city of the same name southwest of Madrid still had the chance to reach the promotion playoffs.
Now even the relegation to the B group of the Second League.
The match against Deportivo La Coruña last Monday was cancelled at the last moment, the prosecution was investigating for a possible crime against public health, the top sports authority CSD is considering the forced descent of the club.
Players and other team members are quarantined in a hotel.
"Until the sixth day of quarantine, they have not received a fresh towel and gel," wrote the sports newspaper "AS".
On photos you can see how players hung underwear and club clothes in their rooms in the hotel to dry after they apparently had to wash them themselves.
The bed linen was also not changed for five days.
Another problem is eating.
Neither is it good nor sufficient, wrote "AS".
The club management, on the other hand, said that they were satisfied with the hotel.
The lawyer of attorney, Javier Tebas Llanas, rejected the accusation of deliberately endangering public health was rejected by Javier Tebas Llanas, the club's lawyer Javier Tebas Llanas.
The Corona rules established by the Football Association were not violated, the son of the president of the Spanish Primera Division, Javier Tebas, as reported by the news agency Europa Press and the sports newspaper "Marca" reported.
Before departure, there were four infected people until 19 July, but they were all isolated and did not travelled with them.
Immediately before the flight on Monday to A Coruña, all players and team members were tested again.
When the team was already in A Coruña, the Corona test was positive for "five or six" other team members.
The game was cancelled 60 minutes before the kickistle, said Tebas Llanas.
Police have to catch horses pulled out of steam compartment
Two animals were on the street.
The police led her back to her owner.
On Sunday morning, just before 6 o'clock, a road user shared two free-running horses on the feeder between the confluence of Donnersdorf / Steinsfeld and the Theres motorway junction.
When the officers arrived, the horses were already between the feeder and the village of Dampfach.
After the confidence of the horses could be won shortly before the steam compartment, the officers were able to gain the confidence of the horses could be won by the officers shortly before the steam compartment, they had a rope carried in the patrol car.
Professional cyclist Tony Martin: Career continuel imaginable
Time trial specialist Tony Martin is thinking about a continuation of his career.
Frankfurt / Main - The seven-time time-trial world champion Tony Martin can well imagine continuing his cycling career.
"I am working with the team to the framework conditions for how and in what form it could continue," said the 35-year-old of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Sonntagszeitung".
Martin is currently employed by the Dutch team Jumbo-Visma and had considered ending his career after this year before the Corona break.
The negotiations with his team are also about the number of race days, he said.
Or other problems that would plague him as a father of a family.
He used to get up after a fall, and the first thought was: "Quickly return on the bike.
Today, as the father of a little daughter, I think: What if ".
The professional cyclist acknowledged that there are certainly aspects with which he is increasingly difficult.
"But it was good for me to see from the Corona time to remember what I have about cycling and how much fun it is for me on the basis of the Corona period."
The time-trial specialist regins the competition at the Tour de l'Ain (5 to 9 August).
Bavaria: At least four dead on Bavaria's streets on weekends
The beautiful weather attracts bikers to the streets in many places.
For at least three people, the tour ends fatally by motorcycle.
An 18-year-old pedestrian also dies.
Schönthal - In the event of accidents on Bavaria's streets, several, mostly young people died on the weekend.
An 18-year-old motorcyclist was caught on Saturday near Schönthal (district of Cham) by a car that came on the counter lane.
It was initially unclear why the car got on the counter lane was initially unclear.
In Upper Bavaria, a 22-year-old met a horse-drawn carriage on his machine on Saturday.
According to the police, he was downhill at Beilngries.
In a left turn he collied against the carriage.
His injuries were so severe that he died at the scene of the accident.
Of the twelve inmates of the carriage, a man was severely injured and one man was slightly injured, the police reported.
In another fatal accident, an 18-year-old died in Bad Kötzting in Upper Palatinate.
He had laid on a street on the night of Sunday and was overrun by a 42-year-old driver.
According to the police, the 18-year-old wanted to sleep.
The driver could no longer brake in time.
At Schönberg (district of Freyung-Grafenau), a 57-year-old biker collided against a car in a right turn despite emergency braking.
He died at the scene of the accident.
The 57-year-old driver was shocked and the remaining three people in the car were uninjured.
The safety of motorcyclists was discussed on Saturday by Bavaria's Minister of Transport Kerstin Schreyer (CSU).
In a letter to the organizer of the biker protests against driving bans announced for August, Gabor Kovacs, announced for August, the Minister referred to extensive investments such as underride protection on guardrails and the mitigation of dangerous corners.
"We have achieved a great deal for the safety of motorcyclists in recent years," the letter said.
"The number of motorized two-wheelclists killed decreased by around 28 percent compared to 2011."
Kovac tests with Monaco against Frankfurt
Frankfurt / Main (dpa) - For football coach Niko Kovac, his new club AS Monaco with Eintracht Frankfurt with his new Club AS Monaco.
The eight-time French champion will perform on 1 August (6 p.m.) at the Hessians, the former club of the Croat, on 1 August (6 p.m).
For the Bundesliga club, it is the first and only endurance test before the return leg in the Europa League against FC Basel (6 August).
Because of the Coronavirus pandemic, the encounter is played without spectators.
"We are especially looking forward to this game.
It is always nice to come to Frankfurt and meet friends, "explained Kovac.
This is an interesting test, said the 48-year-old.
Before joining FC Bayern Munich, Kovac had trained the Hesse from 2016 to 2018 and led to victory in the DFB-Pokal.
"A top-class opponent like Monaco is a good test for us in terms of the match against Basel.
Like all Frankfurt residents, I am looking forward to seeing you again with Niko Kovac, "said Eintracht coach Adi Hütter.
The 50-year-old Austrian had succeeded the Croat the Eintracht.
In March, the Frankfurt lost the round of 16 against Basel 3-– 0 in their own stadium.
Almost 50 new infections: Hof district just past the lockdown
In the district of Hof, the number of known Corona new infections has increased further on weekends: from 39 on Friday and 43 on Saturday (one person has recovered and no longer falls into these statistics) to 47 on Sunday.
In addition, there is a case in the city of Hof.
Thus, the Hof area is approaching the critical mark of 50 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants in one week.
700 dead due to monsoon rain in Southeast Asia
More than 9 million people are affected by the severe floods in Southeast Asia, especially in Bangladesh, India and Nepal.
Due to the strong monsoon rain, a total of 700 people were killed.
In Bangladesh, the Red Crescent is trying to reach the isolated people in boats.
Entire villages are under water.
The farmers have lost their crops.
Tank rhinoceroses in National Park die by landslides
In Kaziranga National Park, several of the 120 tank rhinoceroses died from landslides.
They are under protection and are considered to be endangered with extinction.
This year, the floods are particularly bad, which scientists attribute to climate change.
According to the United Nations, Bangladesh is one of the countries most affected by global warming.
New apartments are empty
In the town of Cox's Bazar in the south of Bangladesh, the state has built apartments for 650 people displaced by the floods.
So far, only a few have moved in.
It is difficult to bring people to Cox's Bazar.
Also the enthusiasm in Grenezn is also maintained.
Anyone who used to have a house, it was also so small and like a hut, often does not want to spend his life in a large block of living.
Many apartments are empty, but - the government wants - will soon be occupied from those who have lost their house as a result of the floods.
60 new corona new infections in just one day in Vienna
In a 24-hour comparison, 60 corona new infections were reported in Vienna - in Lower Austria there were 22 new infections.
The Landessanitätsdirektion Wien and the medical crisis staff of the City of Vienna regularly inform about the current case figures and other key figures on the COVID-19 virus: as of Sunday, 26 July 2020, 8 a.m., 4,840 (+ 60) positive tests have been confirmed in Vienna.
The number of deaths related to the virus remains unchanged at 204.
4,090 (+ 48) people have recovered.
22 new coronavirus infections in Lower Austria
The number of coronavirus infections in Lower Austria rose by 22 to 3,288 on Sunday.
According to the medical staff, a patient has recovered again.
This increases the number of people recovered to 2,936.
COVID-19 currently had 247 patients in the federal state.
To date, 147,253 tests have been carried out.
105 people died in connection with the lung disease.
Argentina rejects counteroffer of creditors
The new demands could not be met, the Ministry of Economy in Buenos Aires on Saturday.
"That would not only be irresponsible, but also unjust," said a statement.
"While 50 percent of children in Argentina live in poverty, we cannot increase the short-term profits of our creditors."
The debt of the second largest economy in South America is no longer viable under the current conditions.
Argentina therefore calls on its private creditors to reounce some of its claims of around 66 billion US dollars (around 59 billion euros).
If there is no agreement, the country is once again threatened with bankruptcy.
It would be the ninth default in Argentine history.
Most recently, lenders had demanded higher interest rates on government bonds and changes to some contractual clauses.
However, the Argentine government is sticking to its last offer and is not prepared for any further concessions.
Argentina is in a severe financial and economic crisis.
The inflation rate was last more than 50 percent.
For the current year, experts expect economic strength to decline by around ten percent.
At the end of May, Argentina had not settled interest receivables of $503 million in interest receivables and had thus slipped into a limited default.
Professionally arrived - privately not yet
"It's going super well" - this is the conclusion by Dr. Stefanie Kramer after her first days in the notary in Eggenfelden.
In the end, everything went very quickly: in mid-May, Dr. Stefanie Kramer learned that she will succeed Lutz Feller in the Eggenfeld notary office.
Only six weeks later, at the beginning of July, the doctorate lawyer took up work, and the normal day-to-day business is already running at full swing.
"But I still have to arrive privately," she explains in conversation with the Rottaler Anzeiger and laughs.
Of course, the short lead time was of course not enough to move the centre of life from Regensburg to Eggenfelden, reports the native Dingolfingerin.
She is currently looking for a suitable apartment or a house in the city with her husband, who works as a judge at the district court in Regensburg, in search of a suitable apartment or a house in the city.
At least her husband was able to apply for parental leave at short notice in order to ensure the care of the two daughters (3 ½ and 1 ½ years old).
In order not to have to commute from Regensburg every day, she also has an overnight stay with her parents in Dingolfing, explains the 39-year-old.
Growing up in the neighboring district, the city of Eggenfelden has long been known to her for a long time.
During visits on site with her family in recent months, she has once again discovered: "Eggenfelden is a really beautiful small town".
She was all the more pleased that she had made the race in the selection process for the vacancy.
Her home country Lower Bavaria also plays a central role in Dr. Stefanie Kramer's professional career: After studying law in Passau, she passed her legal traineeship and the second state examination in Regensburg.
After several positions as a notary assessor, among others in Rehau and Hof in Upper Franconia, Babenhausen in the Unterallgäu and Regensburg - during this time she also trained her doctorate in labour law - she took up her first job as a notary in Rotthalmünster in the district of Passau in 2012.
In 2016, she went on parental leave, followed by her move to Regensburg.
Since then, she has taken over representation services in various notary offices.
When the job in Eggenfelden was advertised because of the approaching retirement of Lutz Feller, she had seen the right time for the full professional return, explains the 39-year-old.
Dr. Stefanie Kramer has completely taken over the team of its predecessor, who will take over the holiday representation in the notary office in the future, has taken over Dr. Stefanie Kramer completely - and has a praise for the team of the law firm: "It is going super well!"
The fact that she can rely on well-rehearsed processes makes it easier for her to take care of the upcoming relocation of the private centre of life.
She has already made contact with a local institution in terms of kindergarten and crib places, she has already made contact with a local institution.
And if everything works as desired, she hopes to be able to pursue her hobby here soon - and to get to know the most beautiful jogging routes of the Rottal.
BVB plans to league start with a maximum of 15,000 spectators
Dortmund The largest German football stadium in Dortmund will not even be filled to 20 percent at the start of the season in the event of a fan return.
"Due to the distance regulation, which must be complied with, we are currently planning with 12,000 to 15,000 spectators," said Borussia Dortmund's Managing Director Carsten Cramer to the "Tagesspiegel".
Normally, the arena in the district city holds a little more than 81,000 spectators at Bundesliga matches.
In the ghost games caused by the Corona pandemic, the BVB lost around four million euros per game.
The Cramer, who is responsible for the BVB for Marketing, Digitization and Internationalization at BVB, hopes that, in addition to the normal spectator seats, some of the approximately 4,000 seats in the hospitality area can also be opened again: "It is, of course, a blow into the office if these revenues completely break away".
In view of the ongoing Corona crisis, everyone is currently "well advised to take a stable page length".
"If many companies are not doing well and 6.8 million people in Germany alone are in short-time work in Germany alone, then the need for entertainment is limited," explained Cramer.
The Dortmund marketing boss praised the BVB professionals for their salary partial waiver, which is intended to contribute to overcoming the crisis: "Of course, the players know that their salary waiver has a different effect than when we put 100 people working in merchandising on short-time work."
Tiny wonders: early start to life with a few hundred grams
Hardly heavier than a Packerl butter, just three tablespoons of blood in his entire body: that was Gabriel when he was born - he weighed exactly 273 grams.
The boy is one of about 400 premature babies that are cared for annually at the Graz Children's Hospital.
A quarter of them weigh less than 1,500 grams, a few - like Gabriel and his brothers Raphael and Michael - are extreme lightweight with less even a kilogram of birth weight.
They are so small and born so early that neither lungs, nor intestines, nor muscles are fully developed.
Their skin is sometimes so delicate that they could hurt the electrodes of an ECG.
And they are so tiny that they sometimes wear doll's clothing and mini diapers specially made for them.
But not so small that they were not in voice - "and how," Berndt Urlesberger smiles.
"Even if they don't scream as loudly as big babies".
When the whiteboard becomes a stage
Despite the Corona Theater in the classroom: The whiteboard as a stage was experienced shortly before the start of the holiday, the 9th grade of the St. James Gymnasium in Abtsgmünd shortly before the start of the holiday.
Actress Julia Sylvester from the Theater der Stadt Aalen presented the production "Das Heimatkleid" to the students - via video.
Afterwards, the students were able to exchange views with the actress and director Winfried Tobias about the play and the performance via Skype.
The idea for the performance format was born from the current Corona situation was born.
Teacher Teresa Nar was happy about the enrichment of the teaching.
Even if in the end all parties involved agreed that the direct encounter in the theatre and stage space would offer even additional stimuli, the theatre also shows the potential for contact with the schools.
"If we further improve the technical framework, this could be an interesting addition to the game," emphasised director Winfried Tobias.
First round drawn: TSV 1860 would meet Eintracht Frankfurt in the DFB-Pokal
Should TSV 1860 qualifies for the DFB-Pokal, the lions meet Eintracht Frankfurt in the first round.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday.
Munich - Sixty possible opponents in the first round of the DFB Cup has been announced.
The lions would meet Eintracht Frankfurt with a successful qualification.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday evening in the ARD sports show.
Because the field of participants is not yet complete due to the corona pandemic, the field of participants is not yet complete because of the corona pandemic, placeholders were used in the draw.
Due to the voluntary abandonment of semi-final opponent FC Memmingen, TSV 1860 is already in the final of the Bavarian Zero Cup (4 or 5 September).
There the lions meet either the Würzburger Kickers or Viktoria Aschaffenburg.
Should Würzburg reached the final, Sechzig would already be permanently qualified for the first round of the DFB-Pokal.
Otherwise, the Giesinger would have to prevail in the final against Regionalligist Aschaffenburg.
The first round of the DFB-Pokal will take place between 11 and 14 September and thus one week before the third division start.
"Gone with the Wind": Film legend Olivia de Havilland is dead
The film legend and Oscar winner Olivia de Havilland is dead.
She died on Sunday in Paris at the age of 104, confirmed her spokeswoman for the German Press Agency.
De Havilland was known for her role as Melanie Hamilton in the southern epic "Gone with the Wind" (1939).
Born in Tokyo as the child of British parents, Olivia de Havilland moved to California as a toddler.
The Austrian theatre man Max Reinhardt discovered the 19-year-old in the role of Hermia of Shakespeare's "Midsummer Night's Dream".
The film studio Warner Brothers signed her for seven years and brought her alongside Eroll Flynn.
She made eight films with the heartbreaker.
In 1946 she won her first Oscar in the leading role of "To Each His Own".
The film was shown in Germany under the title "Mother's Heart".
Three years later, the award for Best Actress in William Wyler's "The Heiress".
She also received much recognition as a neurotic eccentric in "The Dark Mirror" and "The Snake Pit".
Daphne du Maurier proposed her in 1952 for the leading role in the film adaptation of her novel "My Cousin Rachel".
The play was a worldwide success.
With her longtime girlfriend Bette Davis she played in "Lullaby for a Corpse".
From his marriage to the writer Marcus Goodrich (1946 – 1953) produced his son Benjamin.
In Paris, de Havilland married journalist Pierre Paul Galante and had his daughter Gisèle with him.
This marriage also broke down.
Rumors of an affair with former British Prime Minister Edward Heath were never confirmed.
"Road to Timmendorf": Beach volleyball: Thole / Wickler miss final on comeback
The World Cup second Julius Thole and Clemens Wickler missed the final at the beach volleyball tournament "Road to Timmendorf".
At the meeting of the top teams in Düsseldorf, they lost in the semifinals to their national team colleague Nils Ehlers and Lars Flüggen 1: 2 (17: 21, 21: 17, 19: 21).
Most recently, Thole / Wickler played at the World Tour Final in Rome in September of last year.
In the final on the Rhine, their conquerors Ehlers / Flüggen scored a defeat against the surprise team Lukas Pfretschner and his interim partner Steven van de Velde 0-2 (17: 21, 17: 21).
In addition to the show tournament, three starting places for the German championships were played at the beginning of September in Timmendorfer Strand: The tickets were secured by Armin Dollinger / Simon Kulzer, Manuel Harms / Richard Peemüller and Simon Pfretschner / Milan Sievers.
Kalbitz ejection from AfD confirmed - FDP speaks of "fig leaf"
From the point of view of the FDP, the exclusion of Andreas Kalbitz from the AfD is, from the point of view of the FDP, only a "fig leaf" and does not change the character of the party.
"The AfD is the parliamentary arm of the right-wing extremists in Germany.
Andreas Kalbitz is only part of the top of the iceberg of the radicals in the AfD, "said FDP interior politician Benjamin Strasser of the news agency dpa in Berlin.
On Saturday in Stuttgart, the Federal Arbitration Court of the AfD confirmed the exclusion of Kalbitz, which the Federal Executive Board had decided in May.
Kalbitz is chairman of the AfD parliamentary group in the Brandenburg Landtag.
"If the AfD were really concerned with consistently removing right-wing extremists from their party, functionaries such as Björn Höcke and his supporters would have been expelled," said Strasser.
"However, there is no political will in the AfD, because right-wing extremism is now part of the party."
CSU General Secretary Markus Blume said: "The fact that Andreas Kalbitz is now excluded says nothing and does not change anything," he told the "Welt am Sonntag".
"Rather, there are volumes of how many frenetic supporters a right-wing extremist still has in the middle of the AfD."
Blume assumes that the AfD will end up less than five percent in elections in the future.
"The days of the AfD in the parliaments are numbered".
Kalbitz was one of the spokesmen of the officially dissolved "wing" around the Thuringian AfD state and group chairman Björn Höcke; the Verfassungsschutz classifies the stint as a "secure right-wing extremist aspiration".
In May, the AfD federal board threw Kalbitz out of the party.
The reason he stated that Kalbitz had not give an earlier membership in the now banned far-right "Heimattreuen Deutschen Jugend" (HDJ) and the Republicans.
Kalbitz denies membership in the HDJ.
The chairman of the Left Group in the Brandenburg Landtag, Sebastian Walter, also stressed that the decision of the Federal Arbitration Court did not change the character of the AfD: "The wolf only eaten chalk.
The AfD remains a far-right party, whether with or without Kalbitz ".
This decision does not weaken the federal party nor the right wing.
"The manoeuvre of the Meuthen troop is transparent.
One wants to avoid further observation by the Protection of the Constitution and tries to get through under the radar, "said Walter.
"The AfD will not get rid of the spirits it called.
A expulsion does not change anything, "commented the Brandenburg SPD Secretary-General Erik Stohn on the decision in the Kalbitz case.
"To this day, the AfD state association and the parliamentary group still held to their right-wing leader to this day".
The legal dispute over Kalbitz's membership in the AfD will continue.
He announced on Saturday that he would now take civil law against the decision of the Federal Arbitration Court under civil law.
North Sea wind farms provide a good 21 percent more electricity
In the first six months of the year, the wind power plants on the German North Sea fed 11.51 terawatt hours of electricity into the grid in the first six months of the year.
This is a good 21 percent more than in the same period of the previous year, announced the network operator Tennet in Bayreuth.
Tennet is responsible for the transmission of North Sea electricity to the mainland and the forwarding through the German electricity grid.
The wind turbines on the Baltic Sea, which are not part of the Tennet grid area, have fed a further 2.22 terawatt hours (TWh) of electricity.
In total, wind power from the North and Baltic Seas will thus reach 13.73 TWh, compared to a good 11.64 TWh in the first half of 2019.
The wind harvesting at sea thus accounts for almost 19 percent of the total wind power in Germany; that is about four percentage points more than a year ago.
New wind farms ensure higher generation capacities
In addition to the wind conditions, the increased contribution of offshore wind energy results from higher generation capacities in addition to the wind conditions, as new wind farms have been connected to the grid over the past twelve months.
If the 1270 wind power plants in the North Sea were all run at full force at the same time, they could generate 6.7 gigawatts of electricity.
According to Tennet, the transmission capacity is sufficient for this; according to Tennet, it is 7.1 gigawatts.
By 2030, it is expected to rise to 17 gigawatts in the German North Sea.
"In Germany and the Netherlands, we have been investing 20 billion euros in the expansion of offshore grid connections," said Tennis Managing Director Tim Meyerjürgens.
In reality, wind farms cannot exploit their capacity at sea, but reach about 40 percent.
The record day so far this year is January 2, when the North Sea wind farms generated more than six gigawatts of electricity.
On average, the North Sea wind turbines produce around 2.5 to 3.0 gigawatts of electricity, which corresponds to three to four nuclear power plants.
This could supply almost seven million households with electricity.
Art "Skirmish" - an exhibition by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold in the gallery of the Gmünder Kunstverein.
This was almost a small anniversary celebration for the 130.
Birthday of the Gmünder Kunstverein: The exhibition opening "Skirmish" with works by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold blew up the usual frame after the Corona break.
Much more art lovers than usual pursued the dialogue between the artist and the chairman of the Kunstverein, Professor Dr. Klaus Ripper.
The musical equivalent was provided by the band "Defenders of the Universe" on the southern Kornhausplatz.
North of the gallery was the association "Sandtogether" was involved.
Freital: Windbergfest cancelled because of Corona
The Windbergfest will not take place this year.
The city of Freital has cancelled the three-day festival planned in September.
In other years, more than 30,000 people had attended this city festival.
"We have truly not make this decision easy and - in the awareness of how difficult it is for those participants - hoped until the last minute," explained Lord Mayor Uwe Rumberg (non-partisan).
"But ultimately, as organizers, we are responsible for the health of many thousands of people."
If tens of thousands had fcked to the festival grounds and into the marquee, minimum distances, hygiene regulations and contact tracking could not have been complied with in accordance with the current Corona Protection Regulation.
Or the restrictions would have been so strong that not much would have left of a folk festival.
In addition, the organisational and monitoring effort would increase disproportionately many times over.
Rumberg consoled next year.
The city of Freital celebrates its 100th anniversary with the Winterbergfest from 7 to 9 May 2021 and the Day of the Saxons from 10 to 12 September 2021.
Olympic dressage Olympic champion Werth in Achleiten not to beat
Achleiten - The six-time Olympic champion Isabell Werth was the outstanding rider at the dressage tournament in Achleiten, Austria.
The 51-year-old from Rheinberg won four victories at four starts on the weekend.
After winning a Grand Prix with Weihegold and Quantaz, she was unbeatable on Sunday in the Grand Prix Special and in the freestyle.
On the 15-year-old mare Weihegold, Werth prevailed against the Austrian Victoria Max-Theurer on Abegglen in the special on Sunday.
Also in the freestyle on Saturday, the Germans lay in the freestyle on Saturday on Quantaz ahead of their 34-year-old student Victoria Max-Theurer.
Werth's winning horse Quantaz belongs to Max-Theurer.
The most successful dressage rider in the world is to establish the ten-year-old stallion in the Grand Prix.
For Quantaz, it was the first freestyle ever.
At the first tournament in Achleiten three weeks ago, Werth had already won all the important four competitions.
The last of the three international tournaments is planned for 14 to 16 August.
Future more air traffic controllers in Worms in the future
The Worms University of Applied Sciences continues into the air: The "DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung" donors a professorship for "Air Traffic Management".
A corresponding contract between the university and the DFS has now been signed in Worms.
The contract was initially concluded for three years and will start in 2021.
With the professorship, it is the possibility to enable the start of your studies not only in the summer, but also in the winter semester.
This means that twice as many students can be trained as before.
At the same time, the capacities are evenly utilized at both the university and at the DFS air navigation academy.
The DFS will advise the university on the establishment and appointment of the professorship.
Represented at the university since 2019
Since the summer semester 2019, the first students have been in the Air Traffic Management as part of their training as an air traffic controller at Worms University of Applied Sciences.
This year, nine students have already started.
So far, DFS's experience has been very positive, the achievements of the students are excellent.
The combination of studies and pilot training makes a significant contribution to further increasing the attractiveness of the pilot profession.
"In these times, funding is not economically easy for us.
However, we firmly expect air traffic to recover and grow again in the long term.
In order to be able to fulfil our legal mandate in the future, we need highly qualified staff, "says Professor Klaus-Dieter Scheurle, Chairman of DFS, at the signing of the contract.
"For DFS, the endowed professorship is a future-proof investment that will provide air traffic controllers with a broad, interdisciplinary knowledge base in the long term.
We therefore continue our good cooperation with the university and at the same time underpin our attractiveness as an employer. "
This is also underlined by Professor Dr. Jens Hermsdorf, President of Worms University of Applied Sciences: "The endowed professorship forms an important bridge between science and industry.
With it, we would like to build on the existing cooperation with DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung as a practical partner for the dual bachelor's degree programme in Air Traffic Management. "
The trust of German Air Navigation Service is both a motivation and obligation for Worms University of Applied Sciences to further expand its teaching and research competence in the fields of the future of air transport.
In use for the air traffic controllers of tomorrow, the university can set very special highlights and innovative priorities for its students with the first endowed professorship for a dual course of study.
Dr. Denis Alt, State Secretary at the Ministry of Science, Continuing Education and Culture, emphasises: "With its focus at Worms University of Applied Sciences has a unique selling point in Rhineland-Palatinate.
Today's signing of the cooperation agreement strengthens the profile of the university ".
Rescue helicopdriver lands on the A 45
The A 45 motorway was fully closed on Saturday afternoon in the direction of Aschaffenburg, as the rescue helicopter was in operation after a traffic accident.
A 76-year-old drove straight with a Ford at around 12.40 p.m. in the Alzenau-Mitte exit in the bend and landed at the guardrail.
Due to the impact, the front airbags were triggered, the driver suffered minor injuries to his face and had to be taken to a hospital for treatment.
The injuries of the 72-year-old passenger were cared for by the emergency doctor and the patient was then flown to a hospital with the rescue helicopter.
At present, however, the police assume that there is no danger to death.
The damaged vehicle, which caused damage of about 2000 euros, had to be towed.
Heil wants to examine other industries after meat industry
The Corona crisis once again exposed the conditions in parts of the meat industry.
Strengtening of law is imminent.
But are they right - and will it stick so?
Federal Labour Minister Hubertus Heil (SPD) wants to review other industries in accordance with the now planned strict regulations against grievances in the meat industry.
"We will look at the industry for the industry and then take suitable measures for the respective industry if necessary," said Heil of the German Press Agency in Berlin.
Germany's employers are already warning against restricting contracts for works in general.
After the mass corona outbreak at the meat giant Tönnies in North Rhine-Westphalia, the Federal Cabinet wants to pass a law of Heil this Wednesday.
Large slaughterhouses should no longer be allowed to use external personnel for slaughter, dismantling and meat processing.
For this purpose, the use of work contract and temporary workers is to be banned there.
Employer 'president Ingo Kramer said the dpa: "Finger away from a general restriction on contracts for work and employment, if you do not want to completely stranfle the economy".
Contracts for works, for example, the basis for their added value to the customer for large areas of the trade, the construction industry and plant construction, for example, for example to form the basis for their added value at the customer for large areas of the construction industry, the construction industry and plant construction.
"The misdeeds of individuals cannot destroy such an important instrument".
Heil vererte: "My goal is not to ban contracts for works throughout the German economy".
Contracts for works make sense.
"When an industrial company instructs a craftsman to install a security system, this is a normal work contract."
The German meat industry considers a ban on contracts for work and temporary agency work in its industry alone to be unconstitutional.
It is not possible to explain why labour law should apply when portioning and packaging of cheese should be subject to different labour law in the future than in the case of sausage in the future, according to a statement on the legislative project, as reported in the "Neue Osnabrücker Zeitung" (Saturday).
In the event of a ban, the consumer price would increase by 10 to 20 percent per kilo per product.
In many cases, Eastern European employees from plant contract companies worked in the industry sometimes 16 hours a day, according to the results of an examination by the NRW-Arbeitsschutzverwaltung, sometimes 16 hours a day.
Often they had no break.
Wage was withheld for protective equipment or rent.
It was also noted that the situation in the housing of workers was often miserable.
Heil said that a relatively strict law had already entered into force for the meat industry in 2017.
However, these were bypassed by "tricky constructions".
"Now we must be fundamentally tidy up".
The politician announced: "The Occupational Health and Safety Act, which we want to adopt in the cabinet at the end of July, are also measures that not only affect the meat industry - for example, higher test rates for occupational health and safety or clear criteria for joint accommodation".
The draft dpa includes amendments to the Act on the Protection of Workers' Rights in the Meat Industry and the Occupational Safety and Health Act.
Brandenburg's Minister of Consumer Protection Ursula Nonnemacher (Greens) considers more intensive controls necessary.
"I would like us to be able to carry out even more controls in many supervisory areas: food controls, animal welfare, everything sorts of things, including animal transport," said Nonnemacher on Sunday in the RBB programme "Brandenburg aktuell".
But for more controls, more personnel departments are also necessary for more controls.
Three dead in crash of ultralight aircraft in Germany
According to the police, three people died in the crash of an ultralight aircraft on an apartment building in Wesel in the German state of North Rhine-Westphalia.
One child was slightly injured.
Two other people were rescued in the accident, said a spokesman for the district control center Wesel.
According to the police, a parachute was found at the scene of the accident.
The "Rheinische Post" reported, citing eyewitnesses that the aircraft had collided with a hot air balloon before the crash.
The house is a single or two-family house.
Further details were initially unknown.
evacution of Frankfurter Opernplatz run peacefully
One week after the riots in Frankfurt, the evacuation of the Opernplatz in the night to Sunday.
Finally, several dozen people were still on the square, but left it at 1 o'clock before the start of the curfew.
The police have been in duty with numerous officers from the early evening, and a larger police contingent could be seen throughout the city.
For the first time this weekend from midnight, there was a ban on entering the Opera Square, where riots had taken place a week ago.
Policemen had been attacked with bottles out of the crowd of celebrants.
At least five officers were injured after police entry and several police vehicles were damaged.
The night of Saturday had also remained quiet.
Car flips over: Young woman seriously injured in an accident on Bundesstraße 83 at Hofgeismar
In an accident between Schöneberg and Hümme, a 21-year-old suffered severe injuries on Sunday at around 1.25 p.m.
She was taken to the Klinikum Kassel.
The fire brigade used thermal imaging cameras, the fire brigade was looking for possible passengers.
According to the police, the woman was on the way on Bundesstraße 83, the woman was on the way in the direction of her place of residence in Hümme, when her car came off the road for a previously unclear reasons and rolled over several times.
In order to save the accident, the fire brigade had to cut the roof of the car.
Since it was unclear whether there was anyone in the vehicle, the adjacent corn field was searched from the turntable ladder with a thermal imaging camera.
The drone squadron from Warburg, which also works with thermal imaging cameras, was also ordered for the search for people.
However, the emergency services did not find anyone between the high corn plants.
The seriously injured were taken by the ambulance to the Kasseler Klinikum for further care with the ambulance.
Almost 50 emergency services of the fire brigade Hofgeismar, Hümme and Schöneberg were on site.
The highway was closed for two hours due to the accident.
Juventus Turin Champion in Italy
Turin - After a redeeming goal from Cristiano Ronaldo, record champion Juventus has won the Italian championship for the ninth time in a row.
The team around the five-time world footballer made the 36th scudetto in the club's history perfect with a 2-0 (1: 0) on Sunday evening in the home game against Sampdoria Genoa.
Ronaldo scored 1 – 0 before the half.
With 83 points, Turin, which, without the last long injured former international player Sami Khedira, is not displaced from number one two match days before the end of the Serie A season.
Inter Milan is seven points behind.
Juventus was harmless despite optical superiority in the first half, then Ronaldo hit with the last action after a free-kick variant.
The 35-year-old used a play of Miralem Pjanic was used by the 35-year-old from the penalty area line directly with a flat shot (45th + 7).
Against the now more offensive guests, Ronaldo was also involved in the 2: 0, after his shot Federico Bernardeschi (67th) dusted off.
This ensured the lackluster but decisive success.
The foul meter shot to the bar in the 89th minute should have correctly hassed Ronaldo himself with a view to the goalscorer classification.
"It's complicated to stay mentally and physically at ball level for 90 minutes.
The games are strange, and momentum is changing very easily, "coach Maurizio Sarri explained after the 1: 2 at Udinese Calcio on Thursday.
Especially the mental exhaustion of his players is great, said the juve coach.
Because of the defeat, the Turin had not yet been able to make the championship perfect.
In the end, Juve owe the reassuring lead at the top of the standings to the weakness of the competitors.
In the eleven games before the match on Sunday, the Si team won only five victories.
It is questionable whether Ronaldo also becomes a top scorer is questionable.
While the Portuguese superstar has scored 31 goals so far, the former Dortmund Ciro Immobile has already scored 34 goals on his account after his pack of three in the 5: 1 (1: 1) of the fourth in the place Lazio Rome at the Hellas Verona - as many as Robert Lewandowski contributed to the title win of FC Bayern.
The record in Italy is held by the current juve pro Gonzalo Higuaín.
The Argentine scored 36 goals for SSC Naples in the 2015 – 2016 season.
In August, the next title chance awaits the "Old Lady" of Italian football.
Juventus is in the round of 16 of the Champions League, but has to make up for a 1 – 0 first leg defeat on 7 August against Olympique Lyon on 7 August to reach the final tournament in Lisbon.
In the next knockout round, Real Madrid or Manchester City would wait as an opponent.
Baden-Württemberg: More than 250 illegal car races registered
Stuttgart - Despite all threatened penalties and court rulings, motorists continue to accelerate in countless illegal races on the streets of Baden-Württemberg: last year and the first four months of this year, the police in the southwest have already registered more than 250 illegal car races.
Although there are no comparisons for the years before, but the speeders are increasingly doing the judicial authorities: A total of 155 investigations were conducted at the prosecutors's offices between Constanz and Mannheim, a total of 155 investigations into illegal races were conducted at the prosecutors's offices between Constanz and Mannheim in 2018, one year later there were already 252 and in the current year until the beginning of June already 151.
The races were less about organized events, as can be seen from the response of the Ministry of the Interior to a request from the Landtag SPD.
In most cases, the drivers spontaneously competed against each other or they fled the police - this is also indicated as an illegal race.
At the wheel were mainly German men between the ages of 18 and 60.
113 fines - 15 times imprisonment
Only in comparatively few cases are the speeders caught and also asked to pay out: According to the Ministry of the Interior, a total of 113 fines have been imposed since 2018 and 15 imprisonment have been imposed.
However, there is no evidence that the number of illegal car races is actually increasing.
Rather, other motorists reacted more sensitively than before because of the several tragic accidents and processes of past years and reported more frequently, said a ministerial spokesman.
The motorway 8 is particularly popular with racasers. Again and again, motorists brake down the traffic there in order to secure space and use the free track for a race.
Last August, a dozen riders were caught near Kirchheim unter Teck, three months earlier there were even 18 riders on the A8 at Merklingen.
A81 is the most popular "race track"
On the A81, the police registered even more races than on any other federal motorway.
With a speed limit, attempts are made to slow down the speeders on the particularly affected section between Engen and Geisingen.
The mostly high-priced and popped up sports and luxury cars often have Swiss license plates, because the drivers switch to Germany for a lawn because of the high penalties for too fast driving and car racing in the neighboring country.
For the SPD, the speed limit must not be reduced to a few distances: "With a general speed limit of 130 kilometers per hour, we would solve this problem on motorways," says Martin Rivoir, the transport expert of the SPD parliamentary group.
"The inhibition threshold for speeders would be significantly higher if you were not travel here and there with 200 kilometers per hour and more".
Rivoir holds less of enlightenment or image campaigns: "Whoever disregards all rules in such a way and puts not only their own life, but also the lives of other road users, is hardly attainable with reason".
ADAC calls for stronger police crackdown
On the other hand, this is not enough for the ADAC: "We assume that Raser cannot be deterred by the speed limits," says Holger Bach, Head of Transport and Environment at ADAC Württemberg.
It calls for additional and also tougher controls on the affected routes.
Not infrequently, the high-speed showdown becomes more painful and momentous seriousness: Since January 2019 and until April 2020, three people died nationwide in the races nationwide, two of whom are uninvolved in a nocturnal crash in Stuttgart's city centre and one in Gerlingen.
In November, two young men are said to have delivered a car race in November.
One of the vehicles came off the road, crashed against a garden wall and remained on the side, the 18-year-old passenger died.
21 more people were injured in the races of the past two years.
However, according to Interior Minister Thomas Strobl, stricer penalties: "Legislative need for action to sanction illegal motor vehicle races harder is not seen," says the paper of the Ministry of the Interior.
Blue light of 23 July: Thirsty burglar steals drinks from snack
Rohrdorf: A man broke into a snack on Thursday in Rohrdorf (Calw district) and stole drinks and cash.
A witness heard sounds in the valley road at around 3.40 a.m. and ran towards the snack.
There he noticed a man who used with drinks on the fridge and then left the snack through a previously broken entrance door.
The perpetrator fled towards the meadows behind the snack.
According to the police, the burglar also made use of a cash register and stole cash in the low three-digit range.
The suspect is described as follows: He is about 1.75 to 1.80 meters tall and of strong stature.
In fact, he wore a black hoodie, black trousers and light shoes.
The police receive further testimonies are accepted by the police.
Ackermann sprints to victory on the final stage at Sibiu Tour
Professional cyclist Pascal Ackermann won his second day victory on the final stage of the 10th Sibiu Tour.
The 26-year-old Palatine from Team Bora-hansgrohe prevailed on the 109-kilometre long section with start and finish in Sibiu in the mass sprint, after he had already won a stage on Saturday.
The season were three and four for Ackermann.
In the overall standings, his Austrian teammate Gregor Mühlberger prevailed.
The 26-year-old had confidently won the mountain time trial in the morning and thus took over the lead in the classification.
Only 104 riders competed at the final stage in the evening.
No less than 18 starters had fallen victim to the time limit in the mountain time trial.
"I'm really happy to start the season restart with a victory," Ackermann explained after his success on Saturday.
"The sprint was really hectic," said the 26-year-old.
300 meters from the finish, he simply put on his sprint, "and it also worked out perfectly".
According to the rules of the UCI), a Corona test was carried out for all race participants and their companions six days before the start of the race.
During the entire tour, drivers and supervisivers were separated from the organising team and the media in isolated hygiene bubbles.
Viewers at the start and finish were not allowed.
Control center gave instruction on amateur resuscitation
Düsseldorf - Tragic accident on Sunday afternoon in Düsseldorf-Garath.
In an apartment building, a child (4) was suddenly lifeless in the water while bathing.
According to the fire brigade, the emergency call was received at just before 13 o'clock.
"A control center dispatent immediately gave instructions on amateur resuscitation," said a fire spokesman told BILD.
The incoming rescue workers took over the resuscitation measures shortly afterwards.
The child, who was in danger of death was transported to the university clinic under resuscitation.
Why it died is unclear.
The police routinely opened the investigation into the cause of the accident.
The fire spokesman: "We assume a tragic accident in the apartment".
Nuremberg: Unapproved tuning meeting - police intervene, 700 vehicles and around 1100 people
Hundreds of cars and temporarily over 1000 people took part in a "tuning meeting" in the parking lot of a furniture store.
The police implemented their announcement to increasingly control of such events.
A big tuning meeting took place on Saturday evening (25 July 2020) in Nuremberg's southern city.
Several hundred vehicles were involved.
According to the Middle Franconia police, the Nuremberg Transport Police found an increased volume of vehicles in the area of a large parking lot on Ingolstädter Straße.
As a result, the police carried out a large number of vehicle inspections there.
Only recently, the police announced that they would take increased action against so-called autoposers.
Illegal tuning meeting in Nuremberg: Only a small part of the "scene"
The officers counted among the top of a good 700 vehicles and about 1,100 people, according to the police.
However, only a small part of those present can be assigned to the "autoposer" and tuning scene.
Apparently, most of the relevant scene responded to the appeal of the police.
On the basis of the local vehicles and people, it can be assumed that these were mostly onlookers.
In addition, the majority of those present adhered to the applicable infection protection regulations, in particular compliance with the minimum distance and the wearing of a mouth-nose protection.
The control measures carried out on the ground were completed at around 1: 00 a.m.
In total, the officials noted such structural changes in 10 vehicles that the operating permit had expired.
Four of these vehicles had to be seized.
No car races
There were no illegal car racing.
"The Middle Franconia Police Headquarters will continue to keep an eye on the events and continues to carry out increased control measures, also in connection with the advent of onlookers," it said.
The agency News5 spoke to Jürgen Schrödinger from the towing company involved: "They all have beautiful rims, which we must not scratch them," says Schrödinger.
Special tapes would be used for this.
Also because the cars are wider, the company must make sure not to cause any damage.
"After all, the young people should finally get their cars back unscathed".
Figures from the Employment Agency: 900 suspected cases of abuse in short-time work
Berlin - According to the own statement, the Federal Employment Agency (BA) is investigates around 900 suspected cases of abuse in short-time workers' allowance.
"This is extremely little for more than 880,000 companies that have reported short-time work," said Daniel Terzenbach, who is responsible for the operative business, Daniel Terzenbach of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung".
When at the beginning of the Corona crisis, many companies suddenly applied for short-time work at the beginning of the Corona crisis, the BA had to react quickly.
Normally, the exam will take up to three weeks.
"So much time was not available to us at this hot phase.
We will take a closer look at the final invoices.
There will certainly be a lot to do.
We are not naive and have a long breath ".
Evidence of abuse would often come from the employees or trade unions concerned.
In addition, the BA uses analysis software to detect abuse patterns.
According to Terzenbach, the BA is preparing for a possible insolvency wave in autumn.
"Will there be significantly more insolvencies than in the previous year?
The assessments differ, but we prepare ourselves in the event of the case and are already training our employees in the employment agencies for the processing of applications for insolvency money. "
The figures are still inconspicuous, said Terzenbach.
World Heritage in Potsdam: Party in the New Garden dissolved
Potsdam - On Friday evening, about 40 young people celebrated a party in the New Garden.
The collection was dissolved at 8.48 p.m. by the inspectors of the Stiftung Preußische Schlösser und Gärten (SPSG), the foundation announced on PNN request.
The young people then left the park.
On Saturday evening, some young people would have played rugby in the New Garden.
The meadow was cleared by territorial drivers, said SPSG spokesman Frank Kallensee on Sunday.
Again and again there are illegal celebrations in the parks
In the parks of the foundation, there are always accumulations in which the distance and hygiene rules COVID-19 contact ordinance are not complied with.
At the end of June, there was a celebration of about 300 people in Park Babelsberg, a week later about 150 people celebrated in the New Garden.
Even without a coronai regulations, the parks are closed at nightfall.
According to the parking regulations, storage on the meadows is prohibited, there are few exceptions.
The foundation has been complaining for some time that visitors would leave more and more garbage and destroy protected biotopes.
In Berlin, meanwhile, illegal park parties have reached a different dimension.
In the Hasenheide in the district of Neukölln, 5,000 people celebrated an illegal techno party on the night to Sunday.
The event was disbanded by the police.
Austria: Mass tests after Corona eruption in tourist resort
With hundreds of tests, authorities have responded to a Corona outbreak in the popular Upper Austrian tourist resort of St. Wolfgang.
The number of confirmed cases rose to 48, according to the state authorities in Linz.
More than 100 results were still pending in the evening.
Accordingly, many of the infected are young interns in tourism companies, but at least one holiday guest has been tested positive.
Inhabitants, guests and tourism staff were asked to stay in their accommodation on Saturday evening.
The curfew was set at 11 p.m.
"There are cancellations and cancellations" of bookings, said the head of the Wolfgangsee Tourist Board, Hans Wieser, the dpa.
Some guests also left prematurely.
St. Wolfgang is the most important tourist resort in Upper Austria, with more than 400,000 overnight stays last year.
In a normal season, about a third of the guests are Germans.
On Friday, the first infections became publicly known.
The head of the district authority, Alois Lanz, defended the behavior of the interns, who had celebrated in several restaurants and could have been infected there.
"We all liked to do that in our youth," he told the radio station Ö1.
However, two bars were closed on Friday to prevent further infections.
The Tourist Board launched an information campaign to sensitize young employees of the dangers of COVID-19.
From Saturday, hundreds of employees, holidaymakers and locals were tested.
In addition, all guests who were in St. Wolfgang from 15 July were contacted.
The eruption evokes memories of the Austrian ski and party resort of Ischgl in Tyrol, which was a center of the spread of corona throughout Europe in the early phase of the pandemic.
In total, more than 1,500 people in Austria are currently infected with the virus.
The new infections focus on Vienna and Upper Austria.
Premier League: Man United and Chelsea qualified for Champions League
London (dpa) - English football record champion Manchester United returns to the Champions League after a year of absence.
The Red Devils secured third place in the league in matchday of the Premier League, the Red Devils secured third place in the table by a 2-0 (0 – 0) win against Leicester City.
The foxes now have to settle for the Europa League, because Chelsea passed by and also qualified fourth for the premier class.
In the fight against the relegation, Aston Villa was allowed to cheer.
Manchester United took the lead in a penalty kick by Bruno Fernandes (71st minute).
After a red card for Leicester City in the extra time, Jesse Lingard (90th + 8) scored to the final score.
Chelsea, opponent in the Champions League round of 16, won 2-0 (Wolverhampton Wanderers thanks to Mason Mount (45th + 1) and Olivier Giroud (45th + 4) against Wolverhampton Wanderers 2 + 1) and Olivier Giroud (45th + 4).
"That means a lot to me," said coach Frank Lampard, who is also in the final of the FA Cup against Arsenal in his first season as a Chelsea coach.
Tottenham Hotspur also benefited from Chelsea's victory over Wolverhampton also benefited Tottenham Hotspur, who passed the Wolves with a meagre 1-1 (1-0) at Crystal Palace and finished sixth in the Europa League.
Aston Villa won the long-distance duel with Watford and AFC Bournemouth, but had to tremble at West Ham United for a long time for class preservation for a long time at West Ham United for a long time.
The late leadership of Jack Grealish (84th) was immediately balanced for Andrey Yarmolenko (85th).
However, the 1 – 1 (0 – 0) was enough because Watford lost 2 – 3 (1 – 3) at Arsenal.
The club, which missed three coaches during the season, is relegated after five years of the first division.
Just like Bournemouth, who could not save herself by a 3 – 1 (2 – 1) at Everton.
In the end, a point was missing.
Liverpool, which has been the English champion since the end of June, secured a club record with a 3-1 (1 – 1) win at Newcastle United.
99 points are the highest score the Reds have ever achieved in a football season.
Coach Jürgen Klopp and his team narrowly missed the record in English football.
Manchester City holds the record with 100 points in the 2017 – 18 season.
After the Newcastle lead in the first minute, Virgil van Dijk (38th), Divock Origi (59th) and Sadio Mané (89th) played the match for Liverpool on Sunday.
"It was an extraordinary season for this wonderful club," said goalscorer van Dijk after the game, "that should spur us to defend the title.
It will be difficult. "
In the end, the Premier League bosses should also be satisfied in the end.
Due to the Coronavirus crisis, football in England was interrupted from 13 March to 17 June.
In the meantime, there was even discussion about a premature demolition or a play of the remaining games on neutral ground was even discussed.
After all, however, the season could be played without special incidents - but as in Germany without spectators in the stadiums.
Arrests and violence in demonstrations against Netanyahu
The protests in Israel against Prime Minister Netanyahu are becoming increasingly fierce.
During the night there were violent clashes.
On the night of Sunday in Jerusalem, the Israeli police forcibly took action against participants in a demonstration against the right-wing conservative Prime Minister Binyamin Netanyahu.
Twelve people were arrested for participating in riots, police spokesman Micky Rosenfeld.
The police used water cannons to dissolve the rally.
According to media reports, around 6,000 people gathered near Netanyahu's office on Saturday evening.
They protested against unemployment, corruption, and Netanyahu's handling with the Corona crisis.
The protesters beat drums, blew into horns and called on Netanyahu to resign.
Participants in a counter-demonstration supporting Netanyahu were also arrested, the news site reported "ynet".
People also demonstrated in many other places in Israel, including in front of the head of government's private villa in the coastal city of Caesarea and in a park in Tel Aviv.
According to police, a man was arrested near Tel Aviv because he is suspected of having sprayed pepper spray on demonstrators on the roadside from a moving car.
Another man was arrested after a stabbing attack on a demonstrator in the south of the country.
The protester was slightly injured on the neck.
In Jerusalem and Tel Aviv, there have been several demonstrations against Netanyahu in Jerusalem and Tel Aviv.
The rallies accompany the corruption process against the head of government.
Most recently, Netanyahu was also criticized for his handling of the Corona crisis.
Among other things, he is accused, among other things, premature loosening and a lack of preparation for a second corona wave.
The Corona crisis has severely affected the country ’ s economy.
The unemployment rate was last more than 20 percent.
The number of new infections with the coronavirus in Israel recently rose to ever new record levels.
Accident at Ahlen (NRW) - Transporter kracht auf Auto - neun Verletzte - Ruhrgebiet - Bild.de
Ahlen - A rear-end collision caused nine minor injuries on the B58 near Ahlen on Saturday afternoon.
A driver was on the road with her two children (3, 5) towards Beckum.
The police: "Probably she had suddenly slowed down because she wanted to turn."
The driver of a Mercedes transporter who drove behind her must have seen this too late.
He crashed on the car at the back.
In the accident, three occupants in the car and six in the transporter were slightly injured.
Several ambulances took her to a surrounding hospital.
North Korea seals border town after Corona suspicion
North Korea has so far seen its own measures to ward off the coronavirus as a "luminous success".
Now the country is reporting for the first time on a suspicion case for the first time.
Because of a first official Corona suspicion in the country, North Korea has completely sealed off a big city for fear of a catastrophe.
Despite the strictest epidemiological defensive measures over the past six months, "the malicious virus may have been introduced into the country," the state media reported.
The state of emergency had been imposed on the region around the border town of Kaesong.
The communist leadership proclaimed the highest alarm level.
If the suspicion case were confirmed, it would be the first official case of infection with Sars-CoV-2 in the closed country.
North Korea, according to its own statements, not a single infection and described its defensive measures as a "luminous success."
The information was doubted abroad.
The symptoms of the disease were reportedly found in an "outlier" who illegally crossed the military demarcation line between South and North Korea on 19 July.
The person moved for South Korea three years ago and had now returned across the border.
Initially, there was initially no confirmation from South Korea of the crossing of the border within the four kilometre wide and largely mined military buffer zone, there was no confirmation from South Korea.
According to reports from the national news agency Yonhap, South Korea's military admitted the possibility of an illegal border crossing to North Korea as high.
Investigations were carried out on some people.
According to its own statements, on Saturday on suspicion, an emergency meeting of the Politburo of the Workers' Party, chaired by ruler Kim Jong Un.
The "dangerous situation in Kaesong could trigger a deadly and destructive catastrophe."
Kim had already ordered on Friday as a preventive measure to "completely block Kaesong and isolate each district and region from others," it continued.
The person concerned, as well as all the people in Kaesong who had contact with her, had been quarantined.
The central military commission of the party should therefore investigate the "outlier case" as well as the conduct of the responsible military unit and, if necessary, impose harsh punishment.
It is estimated that about 300,000 people live in Kaesong.
Excitement before Council meeting: City-Ost and noise protection are still under discussion before a great summer break
"In addition to environmental issues, the committee members will also vote, among other things, on the development plan for the major project Innenstadtentwicklung-Ost," says the central section of the municipal press release on the next municipal council meeting on Tuesday, 28 July, at 4.30 p.m. in the Great Hall of the CongressCentre Pforzheim.
However, the appreciation of the eastern city is controversially discussed until the end.
The majorities for this are scarce, most recently in individual committees, depending on the presence.
An appeal from the economy (construction, real estate, trade and IT) to let the project developed out of the citizenry and then by the administration and municipal council fail after almost ten years of preparation, criticized project opponent Reinhard Klein as "extra-parliamentary opposition", "unsuspecting", "speculation", "diigration" and "conscious false statements".
"Everyone thinks they knows better," says Klein, who has been a member of the municipal council for a year as the only representative of the Pforzheim citizens' list.
In fact, after reading the Treaties, he is in this position: "I know what I'm talking about."
The exit of the city cheaper, the Technical Town Hall is to be refurbished for 8.5 million euros according to subsidies, the existence of which Klein is convinced of the Technical Town Hall is to be refurbished for 8.5 million euros.
The city will develop quite differently than is predicted in the town hall and on the part of the proponents from the economy.
To shape the city by its own power and not an investor: This is his plan B. One day after Klein, the FDP / FW / UB / LED faction, which also rejects the project, presented an alternative concept.
It also provides for the refurbishment of the Technical Town Hall, the open keeping of the Schloßberg, the rental of the ex-valley for administrative areas and a small-scale downtown redesign in the ideal case with local supports.
Environmental issues play a central role
In addition, environmental issues will play a central role.
Among other things, the local council will vote on the noise action plan.
This includes various measures to protect the population of Pforzheim from health noise pollution, caused by road traffic, including many speed reductions.
In a press release, the local German Transport Club welcomes the widespread introduction of Tempo 30. However, the political leaders in the city are not innocent that this must come in this case, because they have only contributed to the massive increase in car traffic and thus the noise by neglecting bus traffic with thinned out cycles and little commitment to cycling, they have only contributed to the massive increase in car traffic and thus of noise, according to the VCD.
The municipal council also coordinates on the participation of the city of the energy and climate protection agency Pforzheim / Enzkreis.
In addition, the agenda also includes accession to the Climate Protection Pact of the State of Baden-Württemberg, the redefinition of the parents' contributions in the urban day-care centres and the application for inclusion in the smart city funding of the federal government.
Citizens are welcome, but must heed Corona protection measures.
With a lot of delay Tim Zimmermann starts the new season with a lot of delay
With a delay of almost half a year, Tim Zimmermann will start his premiere season in the ADAC GT Masters on 31 July.
Before the league of supersports cars can commence regular operation, the first test drives were now pending.
For Zimmermann, it was all about getting to know his Lamborghini Huracan GT3 better.
The Corona crisis has long prevented Tim Zimmermann from embarking on his first business trip in the new Lamborghini Huracan from Grasser Racing.
This was now possible under special hygiene conditions.
The 23-year-old Langenargener made his first laps on the Lausitzring and was able to get used to his premiere in the GT3 car.
"There are already a few things that are different from the Porsche from the preseason," says Zimmermann.
"With the ABS, for example, you have to go into the curves differently.
But it really was a lot of fun. "
Zimmermann also had fun with Steijn Schothorst, with whom he will share his orange sports car in the GT Masters.
Despite his only 25 years, the Dutman has already been experienced in GT sport and was able to help his new team-mate in many ways.
"I'm not a beginner in motorsport, but every new series also entails new challenges," says Zimmermann.
"Steijn and I get each other dazzling and we have also made tremendous progress from session to session at the Lausitzring."
Right there - at the Lausitzring - the GT Masters will also run its first race.
From 31 July, the 33 supercars will race through Lusatia.
Zimmermann, who is one of 15 series newcomers, knows the track.
In 2015 he was a last guest at the Motodrom.
"It worked quickly and I didn't have to get little used to the track," says Zimmermann, who starts for the Friedrichshafen racing community Graf Zeppelin.
"The Lausitzring has many fast passages, which you have to meet optimally to be fast".
How fast Zimmermann really is will turn out in two weeks.
"Of course, the teams play a little bit in the tests," he says.
"In the end, however, we are very satisfied and look forward to the first weekend at Lausitzring".
The race in Brandenburg will be the prelude of a densely crowded calendar.
By the beginning of November, there are seven races until the beginning of November.
Currently the state is that no spectators will be admitted - but there is a prominent guest.
In mid-August at the Nürburgring, former Formula 1 driver Niko Hülkenberg will reach the GT steering wheel.
British Minister of Transport caught by quarantine decision cold caught
According to press reports, the British government ’ s decision to quarantine Spain holidaymakers for two weeks after their return has coldly caught the country's Minister of Transport, according to press reports.
According to this, Grant Shapps is currently on holiday in Spain, while his colleagues decided on the measure at home on Saturday.
Due to the rising Corona figures in Spain, the Cabinet in London removed the country from the list of countries from which entry is possible without quarantine requirements.
The new regulation will apply from today, Sunday, so Shapps will also have to quarantine after his return.
In Austria, the government has also imposed quarantine measures on returnees.
But the regulation does not apply to those who are just on holiday on the deadline, only from Saturday, August 1, and was not introduced overnight.
By the way, Spain has so far been regarded as one of the "safe countries" in Austria that do not require quarantine in Austria.
"Numerous ministers may have known in advance that there is a possibility that a quarantine for holidaymakers will be imposed on Spain," commented Labour MP Diane Abbot.
"But apparently no one has bothered to tell Grant Shapps."
Almost a month after the end of the Corona emergency in Spain and the expiration of the strict curfew, the number of infections in the country is increasing again.
Virologists blame the nightlife for the new spread.
Spain is one of the favourite holiday destinations of the British.
The British government is currently advising against unnecessary travel to the Spanish mainland, except the Canary Islands and the Balearic Islands, which are particularly popular with British holidaymakers.
To date, more than 272,000 infections with the novel coronavirus and more than 28,000 deaths have been recorded in Spain.
Russia: Navy Day: Putin announces hypersonic weapons for warships
Russian President Vladimir Putin announced in his country, Russian President Vladimir Putin announced the equipment of the warships with the most modern hypersonic weapons.
These weapons, which are unique in the world would expand the capabilities of the Russian naval forces, Putin said on Sunday in St. Petersburg at the central naval Parade.
According to the Interfax agency, the Ministry of Defense also informed about successful tests of the zirconium hypersonic rocket built for the Navy.
The hypersonic weapons have a multiple of the speed of sound of about 343 meters per second.
They are considered weapons of the future.
Underwater tropedeo continues to be built
It will also be built on the atomically mountable underwater torpedo Poseidon, it was said.
The planned sea drone is planned for the destruction of coastal targets.
The president, who himself also sailed a military boat, said that this year alone 40 new ships would be put into service by the individual fleet units of the largest country in the world.
Russia has such a coastal area than any other country in the world.
For 300 years, the navy has been reliably protecting Russia reliably for 300 years, Putin said on the day celebrated nationwide by sailors.
On many other Russian coastal towns, too, the naval forces celebrated the Day of the Navy with parades.
In Syria, where Russia is fighting alongside ruler Bashar al-Assad, the military demonstrated strength at a gun show in the Mediterranean port of Tartu.
Ammunition was also fired there.
A video published by the Ministry of Defense featured not only warships, including a submarine, but also combat helicopters and jets.
Hurricane "Hanna" reaches Texas: help difficult because of Corona
Washington - The first hurricane of this year's season over the Atlantic has landed ashore in Texas.
Life-threatening floods, strong winds and heavy rainfall now threatened parts of the US state, the National Hurricane Center of the US Climate Change Agency (NOAA National hurricane Center on the night of Sunday (local time).
Governor Greg Abbott declared a state of emergency for many districts.
The corona pandemic rampant in Texas made the work of the helpers, Abbott continued, according to the US media.
Evacuees called for caution
"Every hurricane is a tremendous challenge," Abbott said, according to the Houston Chronicle.
With a view to the cyclone in Texas, he added, "This challenge is complicated and exacerbated considering that it is sweeping through an area that is the state's most affected by COVID-19."
According to John Hopkins University, around 5,000 people have died in Texas alone as a result of the Corona pandemic.
Abbott called for caution to people who had to leave their homes.
They should not disregard practices we have become accustomed to ", such as wearing masks, the governor said according to CBS.
It is important that everyone kept their distance.
Therefore, hotel rooms were also made available in some places.
In addition, it should be tested in emergency shelters on Corona.
Damage was initially only reported from the coastal town of Port Mansfield.
Storm warning withdrawn
With winds of up to 150 kilometers per hour, "Hanna" was hit on land on the island of Padre Island just off the Texas coast.
The tropical storm had previously been upgraded to the lowest stage one hurricane.
For the stretch of coastline from Port Mansfield to Sargent, a storm surge warning was issued and later withdrawn.
Authorities expected a weakening, while "Hanna" continued to move inland and headed for northeastern Mexico.
"Douglas" is moving towards Hawaii
In the Pacific, hurricane "Douglas" headed for Hawaii on the night on Sunday with winds of about 150 kilometers per hour.
However, the hurricane center expected it to weaken further.
According to the forecast, it will be on Sunday (local time) near the largest islands in Hawaii - then as a storm just below the hurricane threshold.
Over the Atlantic, NOAA expected an above-average hurricane season over the Atlantic this year following a May forecast.
From June to the end of November, up to ten hurricanes are to be expected, of which up to six could become very strong cyclones, the authorities had stated.
On average, there are six hurricanes across the Atlantic, three of which develop into storms of great magnitude storms.
In view of the available climate data and the higher water temperature in the Atlantic and the Caribbean, the likelihood of a normal season is only 30 percent, that of a below-average even only ten percent, it was said at that time.
US President Donald Trump wrote on Twitter that his administration was closely observing the storms and was in contact with the states concerned.
Four goals revoked: Video assistant "punished" Sassuolo
Sassuolos Filip Djuricic were stripped of two goals
Naples - Four goals scored, four goals revoked: Sassuolo Calcio experienced a raven black evening at the 0: 2 (0: 1) at the SSC Naples in the Italian football league Serie A - and was really angry at the video assistant of the referee.
"A festival of ungiven goals for Sassuolo.
The VAR has never been so tough action against a team, "commented the" Corriere dello Sport ".
Host Naples took the lead through a goal from defender Elseid Hisaj in the 8th minute, in the 32nd minute Filip Djuricic cheered on the balance.
The Video Assistant Referee (VAR) withdrew the hit due to a offside position.
Five minutes later, Djuricic shot the ball back into the net - again the VAR intervened.
The referee also withdrew the goals of attackers Francesco Caputo (50th) and Domenico Berardi (61st) were also withdrawn by the referee team after the advice of the VAR.
In the extra time, Allan made the 2-0 final score for Naples and the bitter evening for Sassuolo.
"For Sassuolo, the VAR is worse than a radar trap on the road and punishes Sassuolo like no team before.
The new technology sets records, "writes the" Gazzetta dello Sport ".
FC Bayern Munich: Pavard injured
Munich (dpa) - The start of the hot preparation phase for the Champions League began with a setback for double winner FC Bayern.
Hansi Flick, who recovered "reasonably well" after a short holiday and a few training days, has to consider after the first team training how he can rebuild his successful defense after the injury of world champion Benjamin Pavard.
The Frenchman, who has the third most minutes of operation behind Captain Manuel Neuer and midfielder Joshua Kimmich, suffered a gang injury at the left root of the foot and threatens to be missing in decisive royal class duels.
In the Munich smuggling weather, the right-wing defender stopped a training match and was driven off the field with a golf kart.
How long the unrestricted regular player has to pause in the fight for the title is open.
A match in the round of 16 against Chelsea on 8 August should be difficult, and the 24-year-old can hope for the final tournament, which will start in Lisbon on 12 August.
The Bavarians, however, do not want to be stopped by the mishap from the training on Sunday.
In his personal triple formula, Flick cited the three attributes he wants to see from his stars on their way to Portugal's capital.
Quality, intensity and concentration are to be shown by his victorious hungry title collectors are supposed to show quality, intensity and concentration in the ideally 28 days until the royal class final on 23 August.
"We simply mastered the compulsory tasks with the championship and trophy.
Now we is important to create something special, "said Flick.
Until the Munich team can deal with the final tournament and previously a training camp in the Algarve, however, the round of 16 against FC Chelsea is pending.
After the 3: 0 in the first leg before the Corona break, the Londoners should not become a Bavarian nightmare again in the home arena should not become a Bavarian nightmare again as in the lost "Finale dahoam" in 2012.
"We have to go through the door.
We want to win, create good conditions and recharge our batteries with a good game, "demanded Flick.
A test for attunement test will be held on Friday against Olympique Marseille.
With a long speech, Flick had sworn his stars, who had 13 days of vacation after the double, for a unique August.
He welcomed 31 players on Säbener Straße, including the new players for fine shopping Leroy Sané, who met all new colleagues on the square for the first time after his move from Manchester City, met all the new colleagues on the pitch for the first time after his move from Manchester City.
"Leroy, like all newcomers," Flick reported.
But instead of talking about the new season, when Sané & Co. are no longer only allowed to train, Flick preferred to talk about the current title project of the German series champion.
After days of individual and small group training, the Londoners are now trained in team strength for the Londoners, who are in the playing rhythm in contrast to the Flick ensemble, are in the playing rhythm.
After that, the Munich team could face a quarter-finals against FC Barcelona and Lionel Messi, in the semifinals, Real Madrid, Manchester City and Juventus Turin are possible opponents in the semifinals.
A way to the final in Lisbon "is not quite that easy", emphasised the head coach, who can rely on the services of his new assistant Miroslav Klose in training.
The World Championship record scorer Klose and Flick know of many common tournament preparation, which is particularly important for the 0-to 100 attunement.
With his current team, working is "a pleasure", Flick praised.
The "focus on winning" is an impressive characteristic of his team.
At the tournament with nine-teams was also ambitious on Sunday.
All of the top performers, including the emigrant Thiago and defender David Alaba, whose whereabouts is not secured beyond the royal class season.
Formula 1 needs a special rule to select its world champion
Since it is not possible to drive on the required number of continents, the FIA must improvise to award the World Cup titles.
All American races were cancelled.
Race calendar is becoming more and more concrete
The race calendar of the current Formula One season continues to take shape.
In addition to the ten confirmed Grand Prix, three more race tracks were added during the week.
In October, the Nürburgring will be driven in Germany and in the Portuguese Portimão.
On November 1, Lewis Hamilton and Co. will compete for World Championship points at the traditional Italian circuit in Imola.
This means that the 2020 race calendar currently includes 13 races.
"We are pleased to continue to make significant progress in completing our plans for the 2020 season," said Formula One boss Chase Carey.
A total of 15 to 18 races will be completed in the premier class of motorsport will be completed in this extraordinary season.
Formula 1 wants to end its season in Asia.
The final race calendar will be fixed and published in the coming weeks.
Before the already officially targeted races in Bahrain and Abu Dhabi in December, according to media reports, performances could still take place in Vietnam and Malaysia at the end of November.
Regulations require races on three continents
However, the Formula 1 regulations require at least races on three continents for the award of the World Championship.
Even if, as currently planned, only two continents are driven, there should be a world champion.
With the help of a special rule, the FIA wants to award the titles, citing "extraordinary circumstances" because of the coronavirus pandemic.
The traditional start to the season in Australia in March had to be cancelled due to the looming corona crisis.
A return to the continent this year is not an issue.
In addition, Formula 1 will not be a guest in America this year.
Cancellation meets with criticism in Brazil
Due to the tense corona situation, the races will not take place in Canada, the USA, Mexico and Brazil.
"We look forward to being back with them next season," Carey said.
The cancellation of the America races was criticized, especially in Brazil: "The rejection was not surprise to us, but we cannot accept the reasons for this," said Tamas Rohonyi, promoter of the Grand Prix in São Paulo.
For example, the number of infections in the São Paulo area is significantly lower than in other regions of Brazil.
Moreover, some teams ’ s concerns about not wanting to travel in Brazil would also not justify any refusal.
We is prepared for the required security measures.
Greta Thunberg: Evil look against Donald Trump went around the world
Greta Thunberg talked about her meeting with US President Donald Trump.
Greta Thunberg was a guest on the well-known latenight show of Stephen Colbert via video clip and revealed in an interview what she had in her mind when she met Donald Trump.
Klimaatkivistin Greta Thunberg was a guest in a popular US latenight show.
Among other things, she talked about her fight against the powerful of the world.
The teenager also talked about her famous "evil eye" during her encounter with Donald Trump.
New York City - Over the past two years, climate activist Greta Thunberg has attracted attention with her tireless commitment to the "Fridays For Future" movement.
Now she spoke in a well-known latenight show about her plans in the future and her meeting with US President Donald Trump at the UN climate summit last year.
Latenight presenter Stephen Colbert welcomed 17-year-old Thunberg to your show on Tuesday and conducted a longer interview with the Swede.
She talked not only about her fight against climate change, but also about her conflict with the powerful of the world.
"There are some things that surprised me," she said.
"How far people go to shift the focus away from the climate crisis," she has shed.
"Everything from organized hate campaigns to threats, just because a group of children take to the streets," she experienced.
Heads of state and leaders who ridicule them on social media or even trying to silence them find her "funny", as the reactions show her "because they have no other answer to it."
It became particularly interesting at the end of the interview when Greta Thunberg was approached about a well-known scene in which she gave US President Trump a bitter look at US President Trump.
At the UN Climate Summit 2019 in New York, for which the nuist sailed across the Atlantic, her expressive view was captured by the cameras and has since been seen by countless people on the Internet.
The short clip resulted in a GIF, an animated image that ultimately became one of the most commonly used images for Trump opponents.
But what did the 17-year-old think about the US president at that moment?
To the relatively open question by Stephen Colbert, she replied only briefly undryly: "To be honest, I think this requires no further explanation".
The experienced satirist Colbert had probably not expected the quick-ted answer and disappeared from the picture for a short time.
With her "How dare you?" speech on the principles of climate protection, she was remembered by many at the climate conference.
Ex-Dortmunder Immobile with pack of three for Lazio Rome
Ciro Immobile is now in the race for Europe's Golden Shoe, Ciro Immobile is now on par with Bavaria's Robert Lewandowski in the race for Europe's Golden Shoe.
The former Dortmund Ciro Immobile still has the best chance of becoming the top scorer in the Italian football championship.
The former BVB pro contributed three goals in the 5 – 1 (1: 1) victory of Lazio Rome at Hellas Verona, including two converted penalty kicks in the extra times of both halves.
This means that the 30-year-old now has 34 season goals from the fourth in the table now has 34 season goals on his account - Robert Lewandowski from FC Bayern Munich scored just as many in the past Bundesliga season.
In Italy, Cristiano Ronaldo follows with 30 goals, the Portuguese superstar met Sampdoria Genoa with the leader in the evening still on Sampdoria Genoa in the evening with the leader in the evening.
Fleetwood Mac co-founder Peter Green died
His life was like a rollercoaster ride: after a rapid ascent with Fleetwood Mac, it went steeply downhill and then slowly up again.
Now blues rock guitarist Peter Green died at the age of 73.
Ingenious guitarist, drug junkie, cult plower: The co-founder of the band Fleetwood Mac, Peter Green, is dead.
He died peacefully in his sleep at the age of 73, and family members said on Saturday in an official statement that another statement would be announced for the next few days.
Top musicians like Peter Frampton praised Green as one of the best blues and rock guitarists.
Mick Fleetwood spoke in an emotional reaction of a "monumental loss" for all former and current members of the band Fleetwood Mac.
The drummer Fleetwood and the guitarist Green had founded the now legendary band in London in 1967, and his dreamy instrumental hit "Albatross" is still unforgettable to this day.
The life of the musician ("The End Of The Game", "In The Skies") was like a rollercoaster ride.
With Fleetwood Mac, Green experienced a rapid rise - the band celebrated their greatest successes without him.
There were, among other things, because Green wanted to donate all of the group's profits to charity.
He began to appear in wide robes and with a large crucifix.
Psychological problems are also said to have played a role.
Three years after its founding, Green left the band in 1970.
This was followed by a social descent.
The blues rock guitarist suffered from drug abuse and schizophrenia, as biographers reported.
For a long time, Green was treated in psychiatry.
During most of the 1970s, the musician disappeared from the scene.
He is said to have lived on the street for a time, worked as a cemetery gardener and spent a time in an Israeli kibbutz.
Green was born in 1946, the son of a Jewish working-class family in Bethnal Green, London, the son of a working-class family.
From a young age he was enthusiastic about American blues musicians such as B.B. King and Muddy Waters.
At the age of eleven he learned the first guitar reefs.
At the age of 15, the teenager began playing guitar professionally and five years later got the chance to be on stage as a lead guitarist for the instrumental band Peter B's Looners.
Shortly thereafter, he was hired by the Bluesbreakers as a replacement for his idol Eric Clapton with the Bluesbreakers.
In the middle of the blues boom, Green founded Fleetwood Mac in the summer of 1967, along with his blues breaks colleagues Mick Fleetwood and John McVie.
The song "Albatross", composed by Green, gave the group the first number 1 hit in the winter of 1968 / 69 and catapulted it to the top of the British music scene.
But the quick ascent soon showed his downsides: Green did not cope with the media hype, his experiments with the drug LSD became more and more extreme.
He later commented on the life between music and addiction in an interview: "The worst thing that happened to me in life is the drugs - the best thing was to land a number one hit".
Towards the end of the decade, Green surprisingly achieved an success in 1979 with an album inspired by religious themes.
Meanwhile, Fleetwood Mac swam on a wave of success without him in a new formation on a wave of success in a new formation.
Their 1977 album "Rumours" sold more than 40 million copies worldwide.
Despite several small solo successes, Green did not make a major comeback until he restarted in 1996 with a group of musicians friends in 1996.
The British "Daily Telegraph" spoke of a rock star who returned to Earth.
Green released several albums with the Peter Green Splinter Group until the band disbanded in 2004.
For music experts, he was a blues legend during his lifetime - and with his gentle sound he was one of the most influential guitarists of the past decades.
